Utah statutes.
31A-21-314.   Prohibited provisions.

No insurance policy subject to this chapter may contain any provision:

(1)  requiring it to be construed according to the laws of another jurisdiction except as necessary to meet the requirements of compulsory insurance laws of other jurisdictions;

(2)  depriving Utah courts of jurisdiction over an action against the insurer, except as provided in permissible arbitration provisions; or

(3)  limiting the right of action against the insurer to less than three years from the date the cause of action accrues.

